Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.030

Administrative committee—Membership, coordinator as secretary.

(1) The joint legislative systems administrative committee is created to manage the information processing and communications systems of the legislature. The administrative committee consists of five members appointed as follows:

(a) The secretary of the senate, and another senate staff person appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the secretary;

(b) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, and another house of representatives staff person appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the chief clerk; and

(c) The code reviser, or the code reviser's designee, serving in a nonvoting capacity.

(2) The coordinator shall serve as the secretary of the administrative committee.

[ 2007 c 18 s 2; 1986 c 61 s 3.]